Tennessee statutes. Title 54 Highways, Bridges And Ferries
Part 2

Tennessee Parkway System Act

54-17-201. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee Parkway System Act.”

Acts 1982, ch. 865, § 1.

Collateral References. Highways
153 et seq.

54-17-202. Legislative findings.

The state of Tennessee has abundant natural and scenic assets and recreational resources for the enjoyment of our citizens and those of other states.

Their general welfare will be enhanced by providing a road system that will promote the enjoyment of these assets and resources in accordance with this part.

Acts 1982, ch. 865, § 2.

54-17-203. Establishment and designation of parkway system.

There is established a system of roads to be known as the Tennessee parkway system as designated in subsection (c).

Roads designated as part of the Tennessee parkway system shall retain their existing system designation.

The initial designation of the system is as follows:

Beginning at the junction of State Route 73 and Interstate 40 in Loudon County and following along portions of State Routes 73, 33, 71 and 32 to Interstate 40 in Cocke County;

Beginning at the intersection of State Routes 73 and 115 in Maryville and following along portions or all of State Routes 115 and 168 to State Route 9 in Knoxville;

Beginning at the intersection of State Routes 71 and 73 near Pigeon Forge and following along portions of State Routes 71 and 66 to Interstate 40 in Sevier County;

Beginning at the junction of State Route 57 and Interstate 240 in Memphis and following along portions of State Routes 57, 18, 15, 100, 22A, 22, 69, 142 and 128 to Interstate 65 in Giles County;

Beginning at the intersection of State Routes 100 and 22A in Chester County and following along portions of State Routes 22A and 22 to State Route 20 in Lexington;

Beginning at the intersection of State Routes 15 and 6 in Lawrenceburg and following along a portion of State Route 6 to the intersection of State Route 20;

Beginning at the junction of State Route 78 and Interstate 155 in Dyer County and following along portions of State Routes 78, 20, 104, 5 business, 77, 43, 1, 13, 48, 6, and 99 to Interstate 65 in Maury County;

Beginning at the junction of FAP route 2 and Interstate 40 in Shelby County and following along portions of FAP route 2, State Routes 3, 3 bypass, 78, 21, 22, 5, 54, 69, 76, 12, 112A, 11, 49 and 25 to Interstate 65 in Robertson County;

Beginning at the intersection of State Routes 20 and 69 in Decatur County and following along portions of State Routes 69 and 69 bypass to the intersection of State Route 76 in Henry County;

Beginning at the intersection of State Routes 6 and 99 in Maury County and following along portions of State Routes 6, 1 and 12 to the intersection of State Route 112A in Montgomery County;

Beginning at the junction of State Route 99 and Interstate 65 in Maury County and following along all or portions of State Routes 99, 11, 64, 10, 82, 55, 50, 15, 2, 56, 150, 27, and 8 to the intersection of State Route 27 in Spur in Hamilton County;

Beginning at the junction of State Route 27 and Interstate 24 in Marion County and following along portions of State Routes 27 and 2 to Interstate 24 in Hamilton County;

Beginning at the junction of State Route 25 and Interstate 65 in Robertson County and following along portions of State Routes 25, 10, 52, 42, 28, 29 and 63 to Interstate 75 in Campbell County;

Beginning on State Route 10 at the Tennessee-Alabama state line in Lincoln County and following along portions of State Routes 10 and 1 to the intersection of State Route 25 in Trousdale County;

Beginning at the intersection of State Routes 10 and 96 in Rutherford County and following along portions of State Routes 96, 26, 1 and 61 to Interstate 40 in Roane County;

Beginning at the intersection of State Routes 27 and 28 in Marion County and following along portions of State Routes 28, 108 and 56 to Interstate 40 in Putnam County;

Beginning at the junction of State Route 56 and Interstate 40 in Putnam County and following along portions of State Routes 56 and 53 to the intersection of State Route 52 in Clay County;

Beginning at the intersection of State Routes 56 and 1 bypass in Warren County and following along portions of State Routes 1 bypass, 1, 30, and 101, county FAS route 601, portions of State Routes 28, 68, 29, and 33 to the intersection of State Route 73 in Blount County;

Beginning at the junction of State Route 40 bypass and Interstate 75 in Bradley County and following along all or portions of State Routes 40 bypass, 40 and 68 to the intersection of State Route 33 in Monroe County;

Beginning at the intersection of State Routes 68 and 165 in Monroe County and following along State Route 165 to the Tennessee-North Carolina state line;

Beginning at the junction of State Route 58 and Interstate 40 in Roane County and following along all or portions of State Routes 58, 95, 62 and 162 to Interstate 40 in Knox County;

Beginning at the intersection of State Route 62 and FAP 16 in Anderson County and following along all or portions of FAP 16 (Edgemore Road), State Routes 9 and 61 to Interstate 75 northeast of Clinton in Anderson County;

Beginning at the interchange of State Route 71 and Interstate 75 in Anderson County and following along portions of State Routes 71, 33 and 32 to the Tennessee-Virginia state line;

Beginning at the junction of State Route 32 and Interstate 40 in Cocke County and following along portions of State Routes 32, 9, 35, 34, 91, 37 and 1 to a junction with Interstate 81 in Sullivan County;

Beginning at the intersection of State Routes 67 and 34 in Johnson County and following along a portion of State Routes 34 and 1 to Interstate 81 in Sullivan County;

Beginning at the intersection of State Routes 9 and 32 in Cocke County and following along portions of State Routes 32 and 1 to a junction with State Route 33 in Claiborne County;

Beginning on State Route 143 at the Tennessee-North Carolina state line in Carter County and following along all or portions of State Routes 143 and 37, county FAS route 723, State Routes 107, 36, 81 and 93 to Interstate 81 in Washington County; and

Beginning at the intersection of State Routes 36 and 81 in Erwin and following along portions of State Routes 36 and 81 to the Tennessee-North Carolina state line in Unicoi County.

Acts 1982, ch. 865, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. FAP routes, referred to in this section, mean federal aid primary routes; FAS routes mean federal aid secondary routes.

54-17-204. Route and promotional markers.

The department of transportation is directed to erect suitable route and promotional markers for the parkway system.

The cost of erecting the markers shall be paid from appropriations made to the department of transportation.

Acts 1982, ch. 865, § 5.

54-17-205. Existing outdoor advertising structures.

Whenever a road or highway has been designated part of the Tennessee parkway system, it is unlawful for any person to construct, use, operate, or maintain any sign, except as provided in subsection (c) or § 54-17-206, or junkyard within two thousand feet (2,000') of any road or highway that is a designated part of the system and that is located either outside the corporate limits of any city or town or at any place within a tourist resort county, as defined in § 42-1-301.

The commissioner is authorized to acquire an outdoor advertising device or junkyard by purchase, gift, or condemnation, and to pay just compensation for the removal of these structures and junkyards.

Any outdoor advertising device lawfully in existence prior to the designation of the parkway may be maintained, repaired, or reconstructed according to the original application for the outdoor advertising permit.

Acts 1982, ch. 865, § 6; 2020, ch. 706, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 11 provided that notwithstanding any law to the contrary, if the department of transportation receives documentation from a federal agency that compliance with a provision of this act jeopardizes federal funding or grant money for the department, then the department shall promulgate emergency rules to address the area of noncompliance with the federal law referenced in the federal agency documentation. The department shall comply with each provision of this act that does not jeopardize the federal funding or grant money. The emergency rules promulgated pursuant to this section may conflict with and take precedence over statutory provisions to effectuate the purposes of this section. The commissioner of transportation shall deliver to the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission a copy of the documentation from the federal agency.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment rewrote this section which read: “(a) All outdoor advertising structures issued a permit prior to April 27, 1982, shall be valid.; “(b) These structures shall be able to be maintained, repaired, reconstructed or constructed according to the original application for the outdoor advertising permit.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 12. June 22, 2020.

Attorney General Opinions. State billboard regulations, OAG 04-082 (4/30/04).

54-17-206. Advertising structures, junkyards, and trash dumping.

The provisions of the Scenic Highway System Act of 1971, compiled in part 1 of this chapter, regarding signs, outdoor advertising devices, junkyards, and trash dumping applies to the Tennessee parkway system. If a conflict exists between this part and part 1 of this chapter regarding signs, outdoor advertising devices, junkyards, and trash dumping, due to a road having been designated as being on both the scenic highway system pursuant to part 1 of this chapter and the parkway system pursuant to this part, then part 1 of this chapter shall prevail. It is the intent of the general assembly that nothing contained in this subsection (a) shall be construed as having any retroactive force or taking away any vested right or be applied to any contractual obligation.

Subsection (a) shall not apply to those parts of the system lying within any comprehensively zoned area, unless otherwise provided by the zoning regulations and within one-half (½) mile of any section of the parkway system where it crosses an interstate highway system.

The following signs are excepted from this part:

Official signs and notices, including directional and warning signs, authorized or required by law;

Utility signs; and

Signs other than outdoor advertising devices, as defined in § 54-21-102, if such signs:

Have a sign face that does not exceed five hundred square feet (500 sq. ft.) in total area if the sign is an on-premises device; or

Have a sign face that does not exceed twenty square feet (20 sq. ft.) in total area if the sign is not an on-premises device;

Do not contain any flashing, intermittent, or moving lights; and

Are located at least one thousand feet (1,000') apart along the highway frontage if the signs are on-premises devices larger than twenty square feet (20 sq. ft.) and more than one (1) such sign is located on the same property.

Acts 1982, ch. 865, § 7; 1984, ch. 613, §§ 1, 2, 4; 1990, ch. 873, § 1; 1991, ch. 233, § 1; 2020, ch. 706, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 11 provided that notwithstanding any law to the contrary, if the department of transportation receives documentation from a federal agency that compliance with a provision of this act jeopardizes federal funding or grant money for the department, then the department shall promulgate emergency rules to address the area of noncompliance with the federal law referenced in the federal agency documentation. The department shall comply with each provision of this act that does not jeopardize the federal funding or grant money. The emergency rules promulgated pursuant to this section may conflict with and take precedence over statutory provisions to effectuate the purposes of this section. The commissioner of transportation shall deliver to the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission a copy of the documentation from the federal agency.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment designated former (a)(1) as present (a), inserted “The provisions of the Scenic Highway System Act of 1971, compiled in” and “signs, outdoor” twice, substituted “devices” for “structures” twice and “subsection (a)” for “subdivision (a)(1)”; designated former (a)(2) as present (b) and substituted “Subsection (a)” for “Subdivision (a)(1)”; designated former (a)(3) as present (c) and rewrote the subsection, which read: “The commissioner of transportation may authorize the construction of advertising structures described in § 54-17-109(1) no larger than five hundred square feet (500 sq. ft.) and the construction and maintenance of signs that do not exceed eight square feet (8 sq. ft.) in area for nonprofit service clubs, charitable associations or religious services in accordance with criteria contained in rules and regulations that the commissioner is authorized to promulgate.”; and deleted former (a)(4) and (b), which read: “(a)(4) The commissioner may also authorize the construction of advertising structures of the size specified in subdivision (a)(3) for business establishments located within five (5) miles of a parkway route that provide services to persons traveling on that route. This subdivision (a)(4) shall apply only to that portion of Highway 79 located west and south of the Tennessee River that is in the Tennessee parkway system.; (b) All business establishments shall be entitled to erect and maintain two (2) directional signs of less than seventy-five square feet (75 sq. ft.) indicating the location of their business premises, with the spacing and zoning required by present laws.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 12. June 22, 2020.

Cross-References. Advertising, junkyards, and trash on scenic highway system, §§ 54-17-108 — 54-17-111.

Exemption of certain advertising structures from permits and fees, § 54-21-107.

Attorney General Opinions. State billboard regulations, OAG 04-082 (4/30/04).

54-17-207. Additions to system — Designation powers of commissioner.

Additions to the parkway system shall be part of the system of state highways, and the commissioner of transportation shall have the same powers set forth in §§ 54-5-101 and 54-5-102 with regard to designating the parkway system as the commissioner has to designate the system of state highways.

Acts 1984, ch. 613, § 3.

Attorney General Opinions. Designation of interstates as scenic highways, OAG 97-061 (5/1/97).

54-17-208. Severability.

If any provision of this part or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this part which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to that end the provisions of this part are declared to be severable.

Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 11 provided that notwithstanding any law to the contrary, if the department of transportation receives documentation from a federal agency that compliance with a provision of this act jeopardizes federal funding or grant money for the department, then the department shall promulgate emergency rules to address the area of noncompliance with the federal law referenced in the federal agency documentation. The department shall comply with each provision of this act that does not jeopardize the federal funding or grant money. The emergency rules promulgated pursuant to this section may conflict with and take precedence over statutory provisions to effectuate the purposes of this section. The commissioner of transportation shall deliver to the executive secretary of the Tennessee code commission a copy of the documentation from the federal agency.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 706, § 12. June 22, 2020.